Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 9
ORGANIZATION - ALLOWANCES - DRILLS

28-3-901. Organization assemblies and exercises.

Each organization shall assemble for drill and instruction and shall participate in encampments, maneuvers, and other exercises at such time and places and for such periods as may be prescribed by the governor in accordance with the requirements of the state or federal law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 626, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-60.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-60.

28-3-902. Encampments, maneuvers, and parades.

The governor may order the military forces or any part thereof into camp each year for such period as he or she may direct and shall also provide for their participation in encampments or field maneuvers at such places as may be designated by the federal government. The governor may, in his or her discretion, order such organizations as he or she may deem proper to parade for purposes of drill, review, or escort duty and prescribe all regulations and requirements therefor.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 627, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-61.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-61.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 601, § 54, effective May 24.

28-3-903. Inspections.

When so ordered by the governor, an inspection shall be made by such officer designated by the governor of all of the military forces of the state of Colorado, and such inspector shall report the number of troops present, the condition of their arms, equipment, and clothing, their proficiency, and such other information as may be required of or deemed proper by him or her. There shall be at least one inspection annually at such time and place as the governor designates. The forms and mode of inspection shall be prescribed by the adjutant general.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 627, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-62.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-62.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 602, § 55, effective May 24.

28-3-904. Pay and allowances.

Every member of the military forces not salaried as such must receive from the state, while engaged in any service ordered by the governor, pay and allowances at the rate paid or allowed by law to members of similar rank and length of service in the regular Army or regular Air Force of the United States, as the case may be, but each such member must receive at least the pay and allowances provided to an enlisted person in the military forces holding the rank of E-4 with over six years of service. Subject to available appropriations, after a member of the military forces has been engaged in service pursuant to this section for a period of more than thirty consecutive days, the member is eligible to enroll in any benefit plan created for employees of the state, including but not limited to state employee group benefits pursuant to part 6 of article 50 of title 24 and the public employees' retirement association created pursuant to article 51 of title 24.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 627, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-63.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-63.

L. 71:

p. 1046, § 8.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 662, § 4, effective May 27.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-091), ch. 24, p. 89, § 1, effective September 14.

28-3-905. Insufficient funds - payment from general fund.

In all cases where any of the military forces are called into active service by the governor and there are no funds otherwise appropriated or available therefor or where the appropriated funds, if any, are insufficient, the payrolls of officers and enlisted men and expense bills shall be audited by the adjutant general and paid upon the adjutant general's certificate out of the general revenue fund, and the necessary funds are hereby appropriated.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 627, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-64.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-64.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 30, § 1, effective March 18.

28-3-906. Units - corporate structure and powers.

Each federally recognized organization of the National Guard, without any further proceeding other than the filing with the secretary of state of a certificate by the adjutant general to that effect, constitutes a corporate body to be known by the name by which such organization is officially designated under the military laws and regulations of the state and shall possess all the powers necessary and convenient to accomplish the objects and perform the duties prescribed by law.

The members of such military organization in good standing, and no others, shall constitute the members of such corporation and shall elect three trustees who, together with the commanding officer, shall manage and administer the civil business of such corporation. The commanding officer shall be ex officio president, and the trustees shall elect one of their number vice-president, one treasurer, and one secretary.

Each such organization may take, by purchase, devise, gift, or otherwise, and hold, so long as such organization is an existing organization and a part of the National Guard, any property, real or personal. All such property shall be in the custody and control of the trustees provided for in subsection (2) of this section. Such organizations may sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of property so acquired.

When any such organization is disbanded by proper authority, such corporation shall cease to exist, and all property belonging to it shall become the property of the state of Colorado and be devoted to such military uses as the adjutant general determines. Nothing in this section shall limit the authority vested in the officers of the organization by state or federal law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 627, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-65.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-65.